Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 13

Purposes and Powers

48-13-101. Purposes.

Every corporation incorporated under chapters 11-27 of this title has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the charter.

A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another statute of this state may incorporate under chapters 11-27 of this title only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other statute.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 3.01.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Documents filed with county register of deeds in addition to the secretary of state's office, § 48-11-303.

Nonprofit corporations, purposes and powers, title 48, ch. 53.

48-13-102. General powers.

Unless its charter provides otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including, without limitation, power to:

Sue and be sued, complain and defend in its corporate name;

Have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its charter or with the laws of this state, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of, or grant a security interest in, all or any part of its property;

Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, or grant a security interest in; and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

Make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations (which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation), and secure any of its obligations or those of any other person by mortgage, pledge of, or security interest in, any of its property, franchises, or income;

Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

Conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by chapters 11-27 of this title within or without this state;

Elect directors and appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

Pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of the current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents of the corporation or any of its subsidiaries;

Make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

Make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the corporation;

Procure for its benefit insurance on the life of any of its directors, officers or employees, to insure the life of any shareholder for the purpose of acquiring at the shareholder's death shares owned by such shareholder and to continue such insurance after the relationship terminates; and

Accept gifts, devises, and bequests subject to any conditions or limitations contained in such gift, devise, or bequest, so long as such conditions or limitations are not contrary to chapters 11-27 of this title or the purposes for which the corporation is organized.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 3.02.

Cross-References. Authentication of corporate instruments, § 66-22-108.

48-13-103. Emergency powers.

In anticipation of or during an emergency, the board of directors of a corporation may:

Modify lines of succession to accommodate the incapacity of any director, officer, employee, or agent; and

Relocate the principal office, designate alternative principal offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers to do so.

During an emergency, unless emergency bylaws provide otherwise:

Notice of a meeting of the board of directors need be given only to those directors whom it is practicable to reach and may be given in any practicable manner, including by publication and radio; and

One (1) or more officers of the corporation present at a meeting of the board of directors may be deemed to be directors for the meeting, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, as necessary to achieve a quorum.

Corporate action taken in good faith during an emergency under this section to further the ordinary business affairs of the corporation:

Binds the corporation; and

May not be used to impose liability on a corporate director, officer, employee, or agent.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 3.03; 1987, ch. 273, § 24.

48-13-104. Ultra vires actions.

Except as provided in subsection (b), the validity of corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked power to act.

A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a proceeding by:

A shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the act;

The corporation, directly, derivatively, or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, against an incumbent or former director, officer, employee, or agent of the corporation; or

The attorney general and reporter under § 48-24-301.

In a shareholder's proceeding under subdivision (b)(1) to enjoin an unauthorized corporate act, the court may enjoin or set aside the act, if equitable and if all affected persons are parties to the proceeding, and may award damages for loss (other than anticipated profits) suffered by the corporation or another party because of enjoining the unauthorized act.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 3.04.

Cross-References. Limited liability companies, Ultra vires actions, § 48-213-101.

Nonprofit corporations, Ultra vires actions, § 48-53-104.